Washington statutes.
RCW 25.10.916

Applicable fees, charges, and penalties.

Limited partnerships are subject to the applicable fees, charges, and penalties adopted by the secretary of state under RCW 23.95.260 and 43.07.120.

[ 2015 c 176 s 6130; 2009 c 188 s 1307.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.